Colorado, session 2026A, HB1049.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 18-5-906 as
follows:
18-5-906. Unlawful use of personally identifying features -
civil action - exceptions - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "HARM" MEANS A PHYSICAL, EMOTIONAL, OR FINANCIAL HARM.
(b) "PERSONALLY IDENTIFYING FEATURE" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL'S:
(I) FINGERPRINT;
(II) VOICEPRINT;
(III) SCAN OR RECORD OF THEIR EYE RETINA OR IRIS; AND
(IV) FACIAL MAP, FACIAL GEOMETRY, OR FACIAL TEMPLATE.
(c) "USE" MEANS TO TAKE, CAPTURE, CREATE, INCLUDE IN, OR BE
A PART OF:
(I) AN ADVERTISEMENT;
(II) A DEEPFAKE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 1-46-102;
(III) AN IMAGE;
(IV) A VIDEO;
(V) A VOICE RECORDING; OR
(VI) ANY OTHER DIGITAL DEPICTION.
(2) A PERSON COMMITS UNLAWFUL USE OF A PERSONALLY
IDENTIFYING FEATURE IF THE PERSON:
-2- HB26-1049

(a) USES A PERSONALLY IDENTIFYING FEATURE OF AN INDIVIDUAL
WITHOUT PERMISSION; OR
(b) USES A PERSONALLY IDENTIFYING FEATURE OF AN INDIVIDUAL
WITHOUT PERMISSION TO INTENTIONALLY HARM THE INDIVIDUAL WHOSE
PERSONALLY IDENTIFYING FEATURE IS UNLAWFULLY USED.
(3) (a) UNLAWFUL USE OF A PERSONALLY IDENTIFYING FEATURE
IN VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION IS A CLASS 5 FELONY.
(b) UNLAWFUL USE OF A PERSONALLY IDENTIFYING FEATURE IN
VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (2)(b) OF THIS SECTION IS A CLASS 4 FELONY.
(4) AN INDIVIDUAL HARMED IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION MAY
BRING A CIVIL ACTION FOR DAMAGES AND REASONABLE ATTORNEY FEES.
UNLAWFUL USE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION IS A
LEGALLY COGNIZABLE HARM. AN INDIVIDUAL MAY INCLUDE IN THEIR
CIVIL ACTION A CLAIM FOR ANY AMOUNT OF DAMAGES.
(5) (a) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN IMAGE, VIDEO, VOICE
RECORDING, OR OTHER DIGITAL DEPICTION DISTRIBUTED TO THE PUBLIC IN
CONNECTION WITH A CRIMINAL INVESTIGATION OR TAKEN BY A PERSON IN
THE ACT OF REPORTING OR DOCUMENTING CRIMINAL CONDUCT.
(b) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A CITY, COUNTY, CITY AND
COUNTY, OR STATE GOVERNMENT, OR AN EMPLOYEE THEREOF, IN
CONNECTION WITH AN OFFICIAL ACT OF THE CITY, COUNTY, CITY AND
COUNTY, OR STATE GOVERNMENT, OR AN EMPLOYEE THEREOF IN THE
PERFORMANCE OF THEIR OFFICIAL DUTIES.
(c) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY:
(I) IN CONNECTION WITH ANY NEWS, PUBLIC AFFAIRS, OR SPORTS
BROADCAST OR ACCOUNT;
(II) FOR THE PURPOSES OF COMMENT, CRITICISM, SCHOLARSHIP,
-3- HB26-1049

SATIRE, OR PARODY;
(III) TO A REPRESENTATION OF THE INDIVIDUAL WHOSE
PERSONALLY IDENTIFYING FEATURE IS BEING USED AS THE INDIVIDUAL'S
SELF IN AN AUDIOVISUAL WORK, AS DEFINED PURSUANT TO 17 U.S.C. SEC.
101, UNLESS THE AUDIOVISUAL WORK CONTAINING THE USE IS INTENDED
TO CREATE, AND DOES CREATE, THE FALSE IMPRESSION THAT THE WORK IS
AN AUTHENTIC RECORDING IN WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL PARTICIPATED;
(IV) TO A FLEETING OR INCIDENTAL USE OF A PERSONALLY
IDENTIFYING FEATURE;
(V) TO AN ADVERTISEMENT OR COMMERCIAL ANNOUNCEMENT FOR
AN AUDIOVISUAL WORK DESCRIBED IN THIS SUBSECTION (5)(c); AND
(VI) TO ANY OTHER ACTIVITY PROTECTED PURSUANT TO THE FIRST
AMENDMENT TO THE UNITED STATES CONSTITUTION.
SECTION 2. Applicability. This act applies to offenses
committed on or after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-4- HB26-1049